Oklahoma, session 2026, SB927.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 5030.1, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 5030.1. A. There is hereby created within the Oklahoma
Health Care Authority the Medicaid Drug Utilization Review Board,
which shall be responsible for the development, implementation and
assessment of retrospective and prospective drug utilization
programs under the direction of the Authority.
B. The Medicaid Drug Utilization Review Board shall consist of
ten (10) members appointed by the administrator of the Authority as
follows:
1. Four physicians, licensed and actively engaged in the
practice of medicine or osteopathic medicine in this state, of
which:

a. three shall be physicians, each of whom is chosen from
a list of not less than six three names submitted by
the Oklahoma State Medical Association, and
b. one shall be a physician chosen from a list of not
less than two names submitted by the Oklahoma
Osteopathic Association;
2. Four licensed pharmacists actively engaged in the practice
of pharmacy, chosen from a list of not less than six names submitted
by the Oklahoma Pharmaceutical Pharmacists Association;
3. One person representing the lay community, who shall not be
a physician or a pharmacist, but shall be a health care professional
with recognized knowledge and expertise in at least one of the
following:
a. clinically appropriate prescribing of covered
outpatient drugs,
b. clinically appropriate dispensing and monitoring of
covered outpatient drugs,
c. drug use review, evaluation and intervention, and
d. medical quality assurance; and
4. One person representing the pharmaceutical industry who is a
resident of the State of Oklahoma this state, chosen from a list of
not less than two names submitted by the Pharmaceutical Research and
Manufacturers of America. The member representing the
pharmaceutical industry shall be prohibited from voting on action
items involving drugs or classes of drugs.
C. Members shall serve terms of three (3) years, except that
one physician, one pharmacist and the lay representative shall each
be initially appointed for two-year terms in order to stagger the
terms. In making the appointments, the administrator shall provide,
to the extent possible, for geographic balance in the representation
on the Medicaid Drug Utilization Review Board. Members may be
reappointed for a period not to exceed three three-year terms and
one partial term. Vacancies on the Medicaid Drug Utilization Review
ENR. S. B. NO. 927 Page 2

Board shall be filled for the balance of the unexpired term from new
lists submitted by the entity originally submitting the list for the
position vacated.
D. The Medicaid Drug Utilization Review Board shall elect from
among its members a chair and a vice-chair vice chair who shall
serve one-year terms, provided they may succeed themselves.
E. The proceedings of all meetings of the Medicaid Drug
Utilization Review Board shall comply with the provisions of the
Oklahoma Open Meeting Act and shall be subject to the provisions of
the Administrative Procedures Act.
F. The Medicaid Drug Utilization Review Board may advise and
make recommendations to the Authority regarding existing, proposed
and emergency rules governing retrospective and prospective drug
utilization programs. The Oklahoma Health Care Authority Board
shall promulgate rules pursuant to the provisions of the
Administrative Procedures Act for implementation of the provisions
of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. S. B. NO. 927 Page 3

Passed the Senate the 17th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 7th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 927 Page 4